North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-38 English Language Learners Instruction

15.1-38-01.
English language learners — Program of instruction.

Each school district shall provide a program of instruction for students who are English language learners. The program may be provided by a school district or in conjunction with one or more districts.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 179, § 1.

15.1-38-01.1.
English language learner — Definition.

English language learner means a student who:

Is at least five years of age but has not reached the age of twenty-one before August first of the year of enrollment;

Is enrolled in a school district in this state;

Has a primary language other than English or comes from an environment in which a language other than English significantly impacts the individual’s level of English language proficiency; and

Has difficulty speaking, reading, writing, and understanding English, as evidenced by a language proficiency test approved by the superintendent of public instruction and aligned to the state English language proficiency standards and the state language proficiency test.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 45; 2009, ch. 175, § 46.

15.1-38-01.2.
New immigrant English language learner — Definition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 64.

15.1-38-02.
Program establishment.

The superintendent of public instruction shall:

Appoint a state advisory committee to assist with the establishment and administration of English language learner programs and the state English language proficiency assessment;

Establish standards for English language learner programs;

Establish student caseload criteria for English language learner teachers, deviation from which may not affect the accreditation or funding level of a school district;

Ensure that the English language learner programs use effective research-based methods to teach the students;

Assist school districts with the development and administration of English language learner programs and services;

Employ a program administrator and other necessary personnel; and

Coordinate federal, state, and local funding to maximize the services available to students.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 179, § 1; 2009, ch. 179, § 1.

15.1-38-03.
English language learner services — Individualized plans.

If a school district determines through assessment that a student requires English language learner services, the school district shall convene a team to review the student’s language and educational needs. The team may develop an individualized language plan and recommend specialized language instruction and related services.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 179, § 1.

TABLE OF COMPARABLE SECTIONS

Table 15.1 Present to Former PresentSection FormerSection 15.1-01-01 15-21-17 15.1-01-02 15-21-18 15.1-01-03 15-27.1-06 15.1-02-01 15-21-01 15.1-02-02 15-21-02 15.1-02-03 15-21-03 15.1-02-04 15-21-04 15.1-02-04 15-21-07 15.1-02-04 15-21-08 15.1-02-04 15-21-09 15.1-02-04 15-22-17 15.1-02-04 15-27.1-07 15.1-02-05 15-21-07.1 15.1-02-06 15-21-05 15.1-02-07 15-21-21 15.1-02-08 15-21-13.1 15.1-02-09 15-21-14 15.1-02-10 15-21-15 15.1-02-11 15-21-04.1 15.1-02-12 15-21-22 15.1-03-01 15-21-01.1 15.1-03-03 15-21-13.2 15.1-04-01 15-64-01 15.1-04-02 15-64-02 15.1-05-01 15-65-02 15.1-05-02 15-65-02 15.1-05-03 15-65-02 15.1-05-04 15-65-02 15.1-05-05 15-65-03 15.1-05-05 15-65-05 15.1-05-05 15-65-06 15.1-05-06 15-47-36 15.1-06-01 15-47-01 15.1-06-02 15-38-04.1 15.1-16-03 15-47-04 15.1-06-04 15-47-33 15.1-06-05 15-47-33.1 15.1-06-06 15-34.1-03(1) 15.1-06-07 15-41-27 15.1-06-08 15-21-04.5 15.1-06-09 15-35-01.2 15.1-06-10 15-35-01.2 15.1-06-11 15-35-11 15.1-06-12 15-35-09 15.1-06-13 15-35-12 15.1-06-14 15-35-14 15.1-06-15 15-49-10.1 15.1-06-16 15-49-08 15.1-06-17 15-47-11 15.1-06-18 15-47-51 15.1-07-01 15-47-43 15.1-07-01 15-51-07 15.1-07-02 15-47-43 15.1-07-03 15-48-01 15.1-07-04 15-48-02 15.1-07-05 15-48-03 15.1-07-06 15-48-04 15.1-07-07 15-48-05 15.1-07-08 15-44-10 15.1-07-09 15-44-11 15.1-07-10 15-29-13 15.1-07-11 15-29-13 15.1-07-12 15-29-13 15.1-07-14 15-29-14 15.1-07-14 15-47-05 15.1-07-15 15-49-01 15.1-07-16 15-44-06 15.1-07-17 15-49-02 15.1-07-18 15-49-11 15.1-07-19 15-49-09 15.1-07-20 15-34.2-14 15.1-07-21 15-29-09 15.1-07-22 15-47-08 15.1-07-23 15-29-11 15.1-07-24 15-44-09 15.1-07-25 15-29-10 15.1-08-01 15-27.5-01 15.1-08-02 15-27.5-02 15.1-08-03 15-27.5-03 15.1-08-04 15-27.5-04 15.1-08-05 15-27.5-04(5) 15.1-08-06 15-27.5-05 15.1-08-07 15-27.5-06 15.1-09-01 15-28-01 15.1-09-01 15-51-01 15.1-09-02 15-28-03 15.1-09-02 15-51-01 15.1-09-03 15-28-03 15.1-09-04 15-28-02 15.1-09-05 15-29-06 15.1-09-06 15-29-05 15.1-09-07 15-47-06 15.1-09-08 15-28-09 15.1-09-09 15-28-06 15.1-09-09 15-51-02 15.1-09-10 15-28-07 15.1-09-11 15-28-09 15.1-09-12 15-28-08 15.1-09-12 15-51-02 15.1-09-13 15-28-04 15.1-09-14 15-47-06 15.1-09-15 15-47-06 15.1-09-16 15-47-06 15.1-09-17 15-47-07 15.1-09-18 15-47-06 15.1-09-19 15-28-10 15.1-09-20 15-28-05 15.1-09-21 15-28-10 15.1-09-22 15-28-03 15.1-09-23 15-28-03 15.1-09-24 15-28-03 15.1-09-25 15-47-08 15.1-09-26 15-47-09 15.1-09-27 15-29-03 15.1-09-27 15-51-04 15.1-09-28 15-29-04 15.1-09-29 15-29-01 15.1-09-30 15-29-02 15.1-09-31 15-28-11 15.1-09-32 15-29-01.1 15.1-09-33 15-29-08 15.1-09-34 15-47-15 15.1-09-35 15-29-08 15.1-09-36 15-43-11.2 15.1-09-37 15-43-11.4 15.1-09-39 15-47-39 15.1-09-40 15-47-40.1 15.1-09-41 15-47-25 15.1-09-42 15-47-14 15.1-09-43 15-34.2-12 15.1-09-44 15-34.2-18 15.1-09-45 15-34.2-13 15.1-09-46 15-47-13 15.1-09-47 15-51-11 15.1-09-48 15-51-12 15.1-09-49 15-51-13 15.1-09-50 15-51-17 15.1-09-51 15-51-20 15.1-09-52 15-51-21 15.1-10-01 15-27.1-03 15.1-10-02 15-27.1-04 15.1-10-03 15-27.1-04 15.1-10-04 15-27.1-05 15.1-11-01 15-22-01 15.1-11-01 15-22-02 15.1-11-02 15-22-01.1 15.1-11-03 15-22-04 15.1-11-04 15-22-09 15.1-11-04 15-22-18 15.1-11-05 15-22-14 15.1-11-06 15-22-07 15.1-12-01 15-27.1-01 15.1-12-02 15-27.1-02 15.1-12-03 15-27.2-01 15.1-12-04 15-27.2-01 15.1-12-05 15-27.2-04 15.1-12-06 15-27.1-10 15.1-12-07 15-27.2-05 15.1-12-08 15-27.1-12 15.1-12-09 15-27.3-01.1 15.1-12-10 15-27.3-05 15.1-12-11 15-27.3-08 15.1-12-12 15-27.3-07.1 15.1-12-13 15-27.3-11 15.1-12-14 15-27.3-12 15.1-12-15 15-27.3-13 15.1-12-16 15-27.3-13.1 15.1-12-17 15-27.3-14 15.1-12-18 15-27.3-15 15.1-12-19 15-27.3-17 15.1-12-20 15-27.3-18 15.1-12-21 15-27.3-19 15.1-12-22 15-27.3-20 15.1-12-23 15-27.3-21 15.1-12-24 15-27.1-11 15.1-12-25 15-27.1-11 15.1-12-26 15-27.4-01 15.1-12-27 15-27.4-02 15.1-12-28 15-27.4-02.1 15.1-12-29 15-27.4-03 15.1-19-01 15-47-48 15.1-19-02 15-47-47 15.1-19-03 15-47-30.1 15.1-19-04 15-34.2-17 15.1-19-05 15-47-50 15.1-19-06 15-47-49 15.1-19-07 15-47-22 15.1-19-08 15-47-01.1 15.1-19-09 15-29-08(13) 15.1-19-09 15-38-13.1 15.1-19-09 15-38-13.2 15.1-19-10 15-49-12 15.1-19-10 15-49-13 15.1-19-11 15-47-44.1 15.1-19-12 15-47-44.2 15.1-24-01 15-21.1-03 15.1-24-02 15-21.1-04 15.1-24-03 15-21.1-05 15.1-24-04 15-21.1-06 15.1-24-05 15-21.1-07 15.1-24-06 15-21.1-09 15.1-25-01 15-41.1-01 15.1-25-02 15-41.1-02 15.1-25-03 15-41.1-03 15.1-25-04 15-41.1-04 15.1-25-05 15-41.1-05 15.1-25-06 15-41.1-06 15.1-26-01 15-21-04.4 15.1-26-02 15-21-04.2 15.1-26-03 15-46-01 15.1-26-04 15-46-04 15.1-26-05 15-21-13.3 15.1-26-06 15-21-13.4 15.1-26-07 15-21-04.3

Click to view